Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1041
Nail technology student instructor, defined.

Nail technology student instructor means a person engaged in nail technology instructor's training in a nail technology school to teach nail technology students in a nail technology school under the supervision of a nail technology instructor.

Laws 1999, LB 68, § 16;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-361.08;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 303.